Hawaii, session 2026, HB368.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 291-21.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (d) to read as follows: "(d)  This section shall not apply to: (1)  Rearview mirrors; (2)  Adjustable nontransparent sun visors [which] that are mounted forward of the side windows and are not attached to the glazing material; (3)  Signs, stickers, or other materials [which] that are displayed in a seven-inch square in the lower corner of the windshield farthest removed from the driver or signs, stickers, or other materials [which] that are displayed in a five-inch square in the lower corner of the windshield nearest the driver; (4)  Rear trunk lid handle or hinges; (5)  Window wipers and window wiper motors; (6)  Transparent sun screening film materials [which] that are installed, affixed, or applied along the top edge of the windshield so long as [such] the materials do not encroach upon the AS-1 portion of the windshield as provided by Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standard 205 or no lower than four inches below the top of the windshield, when measured from the middle point of the bottom edge of the top windshield [moulding] molding if no AS-1 markings can be found in the left or right upper margin of the windshield; (7)  Sun screening devices for front side wing vents and windows [which,] that, when used in conjunction with the glazing material have a light transmittance of no less than [thirty-five] twenty-five per cent plus or minus six per cent; (8)  Sun screening devices for side windows necessary for driving visibility [which] that are to the rear of the driver and for rear windows necessary for driving visibility [which,] that, when used in conjunction with the glazing material, have a light transmittance of no less than [thirty-five] twenty-five per cent plus or minus six per cent; (9)  Side windows [which] that are to the rear of the driver and rear windows on vans, minivans, trucks, or buses; provided that the vehicles are equipped with rearview mirrors on both sides; (10)  Privacy drapes, curtains, or blinds, or any combination, installed on the interior of motor homes; [or] (11)  Transparent sun screening materials, when applied to the AS-1 portion of the windshield, which meets the requirements of Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standard 205[.]; or (12)  For motor vehicles owned by persons having light sensitivity of the eyes or skin due to a medical condition, as evidenced by documentation that shall be updated every two years from a physician licensed under chapter 453, and that cannot be resolved with eye protection devices, any sun screening devices that, when used in conjunction with the glazing material, have a light transmittance of no less than twenty per cent; provided that all side wing vents and side rear windows to which a tint has been applied in excess of the level permitted under paragraphs (7) and (8) shall be rolled down when the motor vehicle is stopped by a law enforcement officer at a traffic stop." SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________